Louisiana, session 2026, HB1227.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1285.2(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1285.2. Investigations and adjudications; staff; complaints; board procedure;
rulemaking authority
* * *
H.(1) Complaints in which the allegations require evaluation of clinical
decisionmaking, diagnosis, treatment, prescribing, supervision of clinical care,
documentation of care, or standard of care shall receive peer physician review before
escalation to formal disciplinary proceedings.
(2) No complaint against a physician in which the allegations require
evaluation of clinical decisionmaking, diagnosis, treatment, prescribing, supervision
of clinical care, documentation of care, or standard of care shall be escalated to
formal disciplinary proceedings unless and until the complaint has been reviewed by
a physician review panel in accordance with this Subsection.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2550 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1227
(3) For purposes of this Subsection "escalated to formal disciplinary
proceedings" means any recommendation or action by the board to institute a formal
investigation intended to lead to formal administrative charges, the filing of a formal
administrative complaint, or other formal disciplinary action authorized by law.
Nothing in this Subsection shall prohibit the receipt of complaints, preliminary
administrative screening, collection of records, or other ministerial investigative
steps by board staff.
(4)(a) The physician review panel shall consist of three physicians licensed
to practice medicine in this state, appointed pursuant to rules of the board, each of
whom shall be in good standing, shall have no conflict of interest in the matter under
review, and shall be actively engaged in the clinical practice of medicine.
(b) No member of the physician review panel shall be an employee of the
board.
(c) When the complaint concerns specialty-specific issues the board shall
endeavor to appoint physicians in the same or a substantially similar field of practice.
(5) The physician review panel shall review the complaint, any written
response submitted by the physician if one has been obtained, records and materials
compiled by board staff, any such other information as may be permitted by rule.
The panel shall make a written recommendation to the board as to one or more of the
following:
(a) The information reviewed does not support a reasonable belief that a
violation may have occurred.
(b) An additional investigation is warranted before any determination is
made.
(c) The information reviewed supports a reasonable belief that a violation
may have occurred.
(d) The matter appears appropriate for informal non-disciplinary resolution
if otherwise authorized by law.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2550 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1227
(6) The recommendation of the physician review panel shall be advisory
only. Final authority to determine whether to dismiss a complaint, require additional
investigation, initiate formal investigation, file formal administrative charges, or
otherwise proceed as authorized by law shall remain with the board.
(7) If the board declines to follow the recommendation of the physician
review panel, the board shall state its reasons in a confidential internal record
maintained in the investigative file.
(8) All records, deliberations, communications, work product, and written
recommendations of the physician review panel shall be confidential and shall be
afforded the same confidentiality protections as other investigative materials of the
board, except as otherwise required by law.
(9) Members of the physician review panel shall be subject to recusal for
conflict of interest, bias, competitive relationship, prior material involvement in the
matter, or any other grounds as may be established by rule. A recused or disqualified
member shall be replaced in the manner provided by rule.
(10) The board shall adopt rules in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act to implement this Subsection, including but not limited to all of the
following:
(a) Qualifications, appointment, rotation, and terms of physician review
panel members.
(b) Procedures and deadlines for review.
(c) Standards for recusal, disqualification, and replacement.
(d) The form and content of panel recommendations.
(e) Confidentiality safeguards.
(f) Procedures for submission of materials to the panel.
(g) Procedures by which a physician who is the subject of a complaint may
submit a written response for panel consideration.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2550 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1227
(h) Criteria for determining whether allegations require evaluation of clinical
decisionmaking, diagnosis, treatment, prescribing, supervision of clinical care,
documentation of care, or standard of care.
(11)(a) In emergency circumstances involving an imminent threat to public
health or patient safety, the board may take immediate temporary action otherwise
authorized by law without first obtaining physician review panel consideration.
(b) Any action taken pursuant to this Paragraph shall be narrowly tailored
to the emergency presented, and the matter shall be submitted to a physician review
panel as soon as practicable if further disciplinary escalation is pursued.